Florida, session 2026, SB56.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 58 59 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âResidential 60 Blasting Safety and Transparency Act.â 61 Section 2.âSection 552.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to 62 read: 63 (Substantial rewording of section. 64 See s. 552.30, F.S., for present text.) 65 552.30âConstruction materials mining activities.â 66 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.âThe Legislature finds that 67 construction materials mining is vital to Floridaâs 68 infrastructure but must be conducted in a manner that protects 69 nearby residences and critical facilities. Existing standards 70 reference the United States Bureau of Mines Report of 71 Investigations (RI) 8507 Structure Response and Damage Produced 72 by Ground Vibration From Surface Mine Blasting but do not fully 73 account for chronic impacts in dense urban settings. It is in 74 the public interest to adopt enhanced residential protections, 75 transparent monitoring, and timely notice. 76 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âFor purposes of this section, the term: 77 (a)ââBlast surveyâ means an inspection that documents the 78 existing conditions of nearby properties before an operator 79 performs explosive blasting. 80 (b)ââOperatorâ means a person that uses explosives for 81 blasting. 82 (c)ââProtected structureâ means a residential structure, 83 school, hospital, nursing home, or critical utility location. 84 (d)ââResidential protection zoneâ means an area within a 2 85 mile radius of a blast site, within which area protected 86 structures are located. 87 (e)ââRoot cause analysisâ means a systematic process used 88 to identify the fundamental reasons for a blasting incident for 89 the purpose of preventing future incidents. 90 (3)âSTATE FIRE MARSHAL; AUTHORITY.âNotwithstanding s. 91 552.25, the Division of State Fire Marshal retains sole and 92 exclusive authority to adopt standards, limits, and regulations 93 for explosives used for construction materials mining 94 activities. This section establishes minimum residential 95 protections that must be incorporated into rule and any permit. 96 Delegation to local governments for monitoring and enforcement 97 is authorized as provided in this section. 98 (4)âRESIDENTIAL PROTECTION ZONES.âFor a blast occurring 99 within 2 miles of a residential structure, school, hospital, 100 nursing home, or critical utility location, the following 101 maximum limits apply at the nearest protected structure not 102 owned by the permittee: 103 (a)âFor ground vibrations, the lesser of the following: 104 1.âThe RI 8507 frequency dependent limit. 105 2.âTwo-tenths of an inch per second for frequencies less 106 than 10 hertz. 107 3.âThree-tenths of an inch per second for frequencies 108 between 10 and 40 hertz. 109 4.âFive-tenths of an inch per second for frequencies 110 greater than 40 hertz. 111 (b)âFor air blasting, an impulse noise measuring less than 112 128 decibels when measured in accordance with ANSI S12.7 or its 113 successor standard. 114 (5)âAREAS OUTSIDE RESIDENTIAL PROTECTION ZONES.âFor areas 115 outside of a residential protection zone, the maximum limits 116 must conform to RI 8507, Appendix B or stricter limits that are 117 adopted by rule by the State Fire Marshal. 118 (6)âMANDATORY INDEPENDENT MONITORING.â 119 (a)âEach blast site must be monitored and recorded by: 120 1.âOne operator seismograph at the scaled distance nearest 121 protected structure; and 122 2.âAt least one independent seismograph operated under a 123 contract with the State Fire Marshal or a local government 124 delegated by the State Fire Marshal, placed per rule for 125 orthogonal coverage. 126 (b)âMonitoring and recording of the blast site must capture 127 ground blast, frequency, waveform, and air blast using 128 instruments that are certified annually by the State Fire 129 Marshal. 130 (c)âRaw and summary data for each blast must be posted on 131 the divisionâs website and made available to the public within 132 48 hours after such blast. Such data must be retained for 5 133 years. 134 (7)âPRE-BLAST NOTICE AND SCHEDULE.â 135 (a)âAn operator shall provide at least 72 hoursâ advance 136 notice of each blasting window by e-mail or text message to all 137 addressees within the residential protection zone who register 138 to receive the notices. The operator and local government shall 139 prominently display links on their websites to direct residents 140 to register for such notification. An operator shall also post a 141 monthly blasting schedule on the divisionâs website to be 142 available to the public. 143 (b)âBlasting may be conducted only Monday through Friday, 144 excluding legal holidays, from 9 a.m. to 5 p.m., unless 145 otherwise authorized for safety. 146 (8)âPRE-BLASTING AND POST-BLASTING SURVEYS.â 147 (a)âAn operator must fund a third-party pre-blast survey 148 upon request by any person who has a structure in a residential 149 protection zone. 150 (b)âAn operator must provide a post-blast survey upon a 151 timely filed claim made pursuant to s. 552.40. A survey vendor 152 conducting a post-blast survey shall be independent of the 153 operator. 154 (9)âDELEGATION TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.âThe State Fire Marshal 155 shall provide a standard agreement for the delegation of 156 monitoring, fee collection, and enforcement to counties and 157 municipalities. Local governments that receive such delegation 158 may install and operate their own seismographs and recover 159 reasonable costs. 160 (10)âVIOLATIONS; PENALTIES.â 161 (a)âAn operator whose blast exceeds the limits as set forth 162 in subsection (4) or subsection (5) commits a violation of this 163 section. Any such operator is liable for the costs to conduct a 164 mandatory root cause analysis along with any corrective action 165 to correct the violation. 166 (b)âIf an operator commits more than 3 violations of 167 paragraph (a) within any rolling 12-month period, in addition to 168 any penalties in paragraph (a), the operator may be subject to a 169 30-day suspension from blasting as well as comply with all plan 170 approvals provided by the State Fire Marshal before resuming 171 blasting operations. 172 (c)âAn operator who knowingly falsifies monitoring data 173 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 174 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 175 (11)âRULEMAKING AUTHORITY.âThe State Fire Marshal shall 176 adopt rules to implement and administer this section by January 177 1, 2027. Such rules may address, but need not be limited to, 178 instrumentation standards, data formats, penalties, and notice 179 templates. 180 Section 3.âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) of section 552.40, 181 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 182 552.40âAdministrative remedy for alleged damage due to the 183 use of explosives in connection with construction materials 184 mining activities.â 185 (1)âA person may initiate an administrative proceeding to 186 recover damages resulting from the use of explosives in 187 connection with construction materials mining activities by 188 filing a petition with the Division of Administrative Hearings 189 by electronic means through the divisionâs website on a form 190 provided by it and accompanied by a filing fee of $100 within 1 191 year 180 days after the occurrence of the alleged damage. A 192 filing fee may not be imposed If the petitioner submits an 193 affidavit stating that the petitionerâs annual income is less 194 than 150 percent of the applicable federal poverty guideline 195 published in the Federal Register by the United States 196 Department of Health and Human Services, the $100 filing fee 197 must be waived. 198 (2)âThe Division of Administrative Hearings has exclusive 199 jurisdiction over claims filed pursuant to this section. Claims 200 arising out of substantially similar blasts may be consolidated 201 for efficiency, and the prevailing petitioners are entitled to 202 reasonable attorney fees and costs The petition must include: 203 (a)âThe name and address of the petitioner; 204 (b)âThe name and address of the respondent, including the 205 applicable user licenseholder under s. 552.091(5) and 206 permitholder under s. 552.30; 207 (c)âThe approximate time, date, and place of the use of 208 explosives which is alleged to have resulted in damage to the 209 petitioner; and 210 (d)âA description of the damage caused and the amount 211 sought for recovery. 212 (4)âIf monitoring data show that a blast exceeded any limit 213 in s. 552.30(3) or (4) at or near the petitionerâs property 214 during the relevant period, there is a rebuttable presumption 215 that the blast proximately caused the claimed damage. The 216 operator may overcome the presumption by clear and convincing 217 evidence The administrative judge shall issue an order directing 218 mediation under Rule 1700 et seq., Florida Rules of Civil 219 Procedure. The parties shall jointly select a mediator and the 220 location of mediation. If the parties fail to do so within 30 221 days after the order for mediation is issued, the administrative 222 law judge shall designate the mediator and the location of 223 mediation. Petitioner and respondent shall each pay one-half of 224 the cost of mediation. If the petitionerâs annual income is less 225 than 150 percent of the applicable federal poverty guideline 226 published in the Federal Register by the United States 227 Department of Health and Human Services, the respondent shall 228 bear the full cost of mediation. The mediation must be concluded 229 within 60 days after the date of designation of the mediator 230 unless the parties agree upon a different date. 231 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 232 made by this act to section 552.30, Florida Statutes, in a 233 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 552.38, Florida 234 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 235 552.38âSecurity requirement.â 236 (1)âAs a prerequisite to obtaining or renewing a valid user 237 license as required by s. 552.091(5)(a), or obtaining or 238 renewing a valid license or permit under s. 552.30, a person who 239 uses explosives in connection with construction materials mining 240 activities must post and maintain a bond or letter of credit as 241 security as required under subsection (2). Evidence that the 242 bond has been posted and maintained in compliance with this 243 section must be maintained by any licensee or permitholder for 244 the use of explosives in connection with construction materials 245 mining activities as part of the mandatory record maintenance 246 requirements of s. 552.112. The person must maintain, in a 247 format approved by the Division of State Fire Marshal of the 248 Department of Financial Services, a completed form that shows 249 the amount and location of the bond or identifies the bond 250 surety and the current bond value. 251 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.